Missouri, session 2026, HB2793.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 516.110, 516.120, and 516.140, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 516.110, 516.120, and 516.140,
to read as follows:
516.110. Within ten years:
(1) An action upon any writing, whether sealed or unsealed, for the payment of
money or property, except the collection of debt to recover money owed to a creditor by a
debtor;
(2) Actions brought on any covenant of warranty contained in any deed of
conveyance of land shall be brought within ten years next after there shall have been a final
decision against the title of the covenantor in such deed, and actions on any covenant of seizin
contained in any such deed shall be brought within ten years after the cause of such action
shall accrue;
(3) Actions for relief, not herein otherwise provided for.
516.120. Within five years:
(1) All actions upon contracts, obligations or liabilities, express or implied, except:
(a) Those mentioned in section 516.110[, and except];
(b) Upon judgments or decrees of a court of record[, and except];
(c) Where a different time is herein limited; and
(d) The collection of credit card debt;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2793 2
(2) An action upon any writing, whether sealed or unsealed, for the payment of
money or property involving the collection of debt to recover money owed to a creditor
by a debtor;
(3) An action upon a liability created by a statute other than a penalty or forfeiture;
[(3)] (4) An action for trespass on real estate;
[(4)] (5) An action for taking, detaining or injuring any goods or chattels, including
actions for the recovery of specific personal property, or for any other injury to the person or
rights of another, not arising on contract and not herein otherwise enumerated;
[(5)] (6) An action for relief on the ground of fraud, the cause of action in such case to
be deemed not to have accrued until the discovery by the aggrieved party, at any time within
ten years, of the facts constituting the fraud.
516.140. Within two years: an action for libel, slander, injurious falsehood, assault,
battery, false imprisonment, criminal conversation, malicious prosecution or actions brought
under section 290.140. An action by an employee for the payment of unpaid minimum
wages, unpaid overtime compensation or liquidated damages by reason of the nonpayment of
minimum wages or overtime compensation, and for the recovery of any amount under and by
virtue of the provisions of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 and amendments thereto,
such act being an act of Congress, shall be brought within two years after the cause accrued.
An action for the collection of credit card debt shall be brought within two years after
the cause accrued.
✔